Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS; PRESERVATION

SUBTITLE A. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS

CHAPTER 3104. POET LAUREATE, STATE MUSICIANS, STATE HISTORIAN, AND STATE ARTISTS

SUBCHAPTER A. POET LAUREATE, STATE MUSICIANS, AND STATE ARTISTS

Sec. 3104.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on the Arts.

(2) "Committee" means the Texas Poet Laureate, State Musician, and State Artist Committee.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 3104.002. DESIGNATING POET LAUREATE, STATE MUSICIANS, AND STATE ARTISTS. (a) The committee shall designate:

(1) a Texas poet laureate;

(2) a Texas state musician for the classical genre;

(3) a Texas state musician for the nonclassical genre;

(4) a Texas state artist for two-dimensional media; and

(5) a Texas state artist for three-dimensional media.

(b) The committee shall choose the poet laureate, state musicians, and state artists from a list of persons submitted by the commission.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 281), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 3104.003. COMMITTEE. (a) The committee consists of seven members as follows:

(1) one member appointed by the governor;

(2) three members appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(3) three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(b) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives must be the chair of the house committee that has primary jurisdiction over arts and cultural matters. That member serves on the committee as an additional duty of the chairmanship.

(c) A member of the committee who is not a member of the legislature serves a two-year term that expires on October 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(d) The committee shall select a presiding officer from among its members.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 3104.004. RECOMMENDATIONS FROM COMMISSION. (a) The commission shall solicit nominations from the arts and cultural community for the poet laureate, state musicians, and state artists. The commission shall use the commission's Texas Cultural & Arts Network, the media, public meetings, newsletters, the Writer's League of Texas, and other appropriate methods to distribute information about the nomination process.

(b) The commission may receive submissions from poets, musicians, and artists who have been nominated.

(c) The commission may assemble a group of artists, musicians, writers, scholars, and other appropriate experts in the fields of literature, music, and visual arts to:

(1) review the submissions from the nominated poets, musicians, and artists; and

(2) provide advice and recommendations to the commission on who should be considered for designation as poet laureate, state musicians, and state artists.

(d) For each category specified under Section 3104.002(a), the commission shall submit to the committee a list of not more than 10 persons who are worthy of being designated for that category.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 281), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 3104.005. DESIGNATION CEREMONY. The governor and members of the committee shall honor the persons designated as poet laureate, state musicians, and state artists in a ceremony at the Capitol.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 281), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 3104.006. DURATION OF DESIGNATION. A person designated as the poet laureate, a state musician, or a state artist retains the designation for one year from the date of the designation ceremony.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 281), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 3104.007. PAY AND EMOLUMENTS PROHIBITED. A person designated as the poet laureate, a state musician, or a state artist does not receive any pay or emolument based on that designation.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 281), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS STATE HISTORIAN

Sec. 3104.051. STATE HISTORIAN. (a) The state historian shall be appointed by the governor on the recommendation of the Texas Historical Commission and the Texas State Historical Association. If the entities cannot agree on a nominee, each shall submit one candidate to the governor, who shall make the designation.

(b) In making an appointment under Subsection (a), the governor may reject one or more of the nominees submitted and request a new list of different nominees.

(c) The duties of the state historian shall include:

(1) enhancing the knowledge of Texans regarding Texas history and heritage;

(2) encouraging the teaching of Texas history in public schools;

(3) consulting with the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the legislature on matters related to the promotion of Texas history; and

(4) lecturing on matters of Texas history within the state historian's area of expertise.

(d) The state historian shall not receive compensation or reimbursement for expenses from the state for serving as state historian.

(e) The governor, the lieutenant governor, and the speaker of the house of representatives, or their appointees, shall honor the person designated as state historian in a ceremony at the Capitol.

(f) An individual designated as the state historian retains the designation for two years from the date of the ceremony.

(g) The facilities and resources of the Texas Historical Commission in Austin shall be made available for the use of the state historian when needed.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 427 (S.B. 1787), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.